bg-BG: Предназначен потребител: Кабинен екипаж; Втори пилот; Полетен екипаж; Инструктор; Поддръжка/наземен екипаж; Военен екипаж; Пътник; Пилот; Обучаващ се пилот; Други
zh-TW: 適用使用者: 機艙空服員; 副駕駛; 飛行機組員; 教練; 維修/地勤人員; 軍用機組員; 乘客; 飛行員; 實習飛行員; 其他
zh-CN: 目标用户: 乘务员; 副驾驶员; 机组人员; 教练; 维修/地勤人员; 军用机组人员; 乘客; 飞行员; 飞行学员; 其他
sl-SI: Predvideni uporabnik: Kabinsko osebje; Kopilot; Letaško osebje; Inštruktor; Vzdrževalno/zemeljsko osebje; Vojaško letaško osebje; Potnik; Pilot; Učenec letenja; Drugo
ja: 対象ユーザー: 客室乗務員; 副操縦士; 運航乗務員; インストラクター; 整備/グランドクルー; 軍用機乗組員; 乗客; パイロット; 訓練生（パイロット）; その他
pt-PT: Utilizador pretendido: Tripulação de cabine; Copiloto; Tripulação de voo; Instrutor; Equipa de manutenção/terra; Tripulação militar; Passageiro; Piloto; Aluno de pilotagem; Outro
de: Zielgruppe: Kabinenpersonal; Co-Pilot; Flugpersonal; Instruktor; Wartungs-/Bodenpersonal; Militärisches Flugpersonal; Fluggast; Pilot:in; Flugschüler:in; Sonstige
en: Intended user: Cabin crew; Co-pilot; Flight crew; Instructor; Maintenance/ground crew; Military aircrew; Passenger; Pilot; Student pilot; Other
hu: A termék célközönsége: Kabinszemélyzet; Másodpilóta; Hajózószemélyzet; Oktató; Karbantartó / földi kiszolgáló személyzet; Katonai repülőszemélyzet; Utas; Pilóta; Pilótanövendék; Egyéb
cs: Zamýšlený uživatel: Palubní personál; Druhý pilot; Letová posádka; Instruktor; Údržba / pozemní personál; Vojenský letecký personál; Cestující; Pilot; Pilotní žák; Jiné
nb: Tiltenkt bruker: Kabinpersonale; Andrepilot; Flypersonale; Instruktør; Vedlikehold-/bakkemannskap; Militært flypersonell; Passasjer; Pilot; Elevpilot; Annet
vi: Người dùng dự định: Tiếp viên hàng không; Cơ phó; Phi hành đoàn; Huấn luyện viên; Bảo trì/nhân viên mặt đất; Tổ bay quân sự; Hành khách; Phi công; Học viên phi công; Khác
nl: Beoogde gebruiker: Cabinepersoneel; Co-piloot; Vliegpersoneel; Instructeur; Onderhouds-/grondpersoneel; Militair vliegpersoneel; Passagier; Piloot; Student-piloot; Overig
el: Προοριζόμενος χρήστης: Πλήρωμα καμπίνας; Συγκυβερνήτης; Πλήρωμα πτήσης; Εκπαιδευτής; Συντήρηση/πλήρωμα εδάφους; Στρατιωτικό πλήρωμα πτήσης; Επιβάτης; Πιλότος; Εκπαιδευόμενος πιλότος; Άλλο
ru: Предназначенный пользователь: Экипаж салона; Второй пилот; Летный экипаж; Инструктор; Технический/наземный персонал; Военный летный экипаж; Пассажир; Пилот; Курсант; Другое
fi: Tarkoitettu käyttäjä: Matkustamotyöntekijä; Perämies; Lentohenkilöstö; Opettaja; Huolto-/maajoukko; Sotilaslentohenkilöstö; Matkustaja; Lentäjä; Lentäjäoppilas; Muu
fr: Utilisateur visé: Personnel de cabine; Copilote; Équipage de conduite; Instructeur; Personnel de maintenance/au sol; Équipage militaire; Passager; Pilote; Élève-pilote; Autre
tr: Hedef kullanıcı: Kabin ekibi; Yardımcı pilot; Uçuş ekibi; Eğitmen; Bakım/yer ekibi; Askeri hava ekibi; Yolcu; Pilot; Öğrenci pilot; Diğer
pl: Przeznaczony użytkownik: Personel pokładowy; Drugi pilot; Załoga lotnicza; Instruktor; Personel techniczny / naziemny; Załoga wojskowa; Pasażer; Pilot; Uczeń pilot; Inne
hr-HR: Namijenjeni korisnik: Kabinsko osoblje; Kopilot; Letačko osoblje; Instruktor; Osoblje za održavanje / zemaljsko osoblje; Vojno letačko osoblje; Putnik; Pilot; Pilot učenik; Ostalo
es: Usuario previsto: Tripulación de cabina; Copiloto; Tripulación de vuelo; Instructor; Equipo de mantenimiento/tierra; Tripulación militar; Pasajero; Piloto; Estudiante de piloto; Otro
ro-RO: Utilizatorul țintă: Echipaj de cabină; Copilot; Echipaj de zbor; Instructor; Personal de întreținere/la sol; Echipaj militar; Pasager; Pilot; Pilot elev; Altele
sk-SK: Zamýšľaný používateľ: Palubný personál; Kopilot; Letová posádka; Inštruktor; Údržba/pozemný personál; Vojenská letová posádka; Cestujúci; Pilot; Študent pilotáže; Iné
it: Utente previsto: Equipaggio di cabina; Copilota; Equipaggio di volo; Istruttore; Personale di terra/di manutenzione; Equipaggio militare; Passeggero; Pilota; Allievo pilota; Altro
sv: Avsedd användare: Kabinpersonal; Andrepilot; Besättning; Instruktör; Underhålls-/markpersonal; Militär flygbesättning; Passagerare; Pilot; Flygelev; Annat
th: กลุ่มเป้าหมาย: ลูกเรือ; นักบินผู้ช่วย; ลูกเรือผู้ปฏิบัติการบิน; ผู้ฝึกสอน; พนักงานซ่อมบำรุง/ภาคพื้นดิน; ลูกเรือทหาร; ผู้โดยสาร; นักบิน; นักบินฝึกหัด; อื่นๆ
da: Tilsigtet bruger: Kabinepersonale; Andenpilot; Flypersonale; Instruktør; Vedligeholdelses-/jordpersonale; Militært flypersonale; Passager; Pilot; Pilotelev; Andet
ko: 대상 사용자: 객실 승무원; 부조종사; 운항 승무원; 강사; 정비/지상 승무원; 군용기 승무원; 승객; 조종사; 학생 조종사; 기타
pt-BR: Usuário pretendido: Tripulação de cabine; Copiloto; Tripulação de voo; Instrutor; Manutenção/equipe de solo; Tripulação militar; Passageiro; Piloto; Aluno piloto; Outros
lt-LT: Numatytas naudotojas: Salono įgula; Antrasis pilotas; Skrydžio įgula; Instruktorius; Techninės priežiūros / antžeminio aptarnavimo personalas; Karinių oro pajėgų įgula; Keleivis; Pilotas; Pilotas mokinys; Kita